Louisiana, session 2026, SB366.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1231.2(B)(1) and (2) and (D)(5), 1231.3(A)(1), (2), and (3), and
1231.8(A)(1)(a) and (B)(1)(a)(i) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
40:1231.3(B)(3) and (4) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1231.2. Limitation of recovery
* * *
B.(1) The total amount recoverable for all malpractice claims for injuries to
or death of a patient, exclusive of future medical care and related benefits as
provided in R.S. 40:1231.3, economic loss including loss of income or earning
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-570 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 366
capacity and past or future medical expenses, shall not exceed five hundred
thousand one million dollars plus interest and cost. This limitation shall be
adjusted annually for inflation by a percentage increase equal to the change in
the Consumer Price Index published by the United States Bureau of Labor
Statistics for the preceding year.
(2) A health care healthcare provider qualified under this Part is not liable
for an amount in excess of one hundred two hundred fifty thousand dollars plus
interest thereon accruing after April 1, 1991, and costs specifically provided for by
this Paragraph for all malpractice claims because of injuries to or death of any one
patient. The sole cost for which a health care healthcare provider qualified under
this Part may be assessed by a trial court shall be limited to the cost incurred prior
to the rendering of a final judgment against the health care healthcare provider, not
as a nominal defendant, after a trial on a malpractice claim, including but not limited
to, costs assessed pursuant to Code of Civil Procedure Article 970 in any instance
where the board was not the offeror or offeree of the proposed settlement amount.
The health care healthcare provider shall not be assessed costs in any action in
which the fund intervenes or the health care healthcare provider is a nominal
defendant after there has been a settlement between the health care healthcare
provider and the claimant. This limitation shall be adjusted annually for inflation
by a percentage increase equal to the change in the Consumer Price Index
published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics for the preceding
year.
* * *
D. * * *
(5) In the event that a partial settlement is executed between the defendant
and/or or his insurer, or both, with a plaintiff for the sum of one hundred thousand
dollars or less equal to the limitation provided by Paragraph (B)(2) of this
Section, written notice of such settlement shall promptly be sent to the board by the
defendant or his insurer. Such settlement shall not bar the continuation of the
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-570 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 366
action against the patient's compensation fund for excess sums in which event the
court sha1l reduce any judgment to the plaintiff in the amount of malpractice liability
insurance in force as provided for in R.S. 40:1231.2(B)(2) damages in excess of the
partial settlement, but any subsequent judgment awarded to the claimant shall
be reduced by the court in an amount equivalent to the partial settlement.
* * *
§1231.3. Future medical care and related benefits
A.(1) In all malpractice claims filed with the board which proceed to trial, the
court or jury shall be given a special interrogatory asking if the patient is in need of
future medical care and related benefits that will be incurred after the date of the
response to the special interrogatory, and required to make a specific finding of
fact regarding the amount, if any, of future medical expenses and related
benefits that are due the claimant after the date of the conclusion of the trial,
and if so, the amount thereof.
(2) In actions upon malpractice claims tried by the court, the court's finding
shall include a recitation that the patient is or is not in need of future medical care
and related benefits that will be incurred after the date of the court's finding and the
amount thereof If the award pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection,
together with all other recoverable elements of damage awarded, does not
exceed one million dollars, as adjusted for inflation as provided by R.S.
40:1231.2(B)(1), the full amount awarded shall be due and payable to the
patient without regard to this Section as any other element of damage.
(3)(a) If the total amount is for the maximum amount recoverable, exclusive
of the value of future medical care and related benefits that will be incurred after the
date of the response to the special interrogatory by the jury or the court's finding, the
cost of all future medical care and related benefits that will be incurred after the date
of the response to the special interrogatory by the jury or the court's finding shall be
paid in accordance with R.S. 40:1231.3(C). If the court or jury award pursuant
to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, together with all other recoverable elements
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-570 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 366
of damage awarded, exceeds one million dollars, as adjusted for inflation as
provided by R.S. 40:1231.2(B)(1), the court shall make a determination whether
it is in the best interest of the patient for the excess of the award to be payable
to the claimant by the Patient's Compensation Fund without regard to this
Section as any other element of damage, or should be held in trust with the
Patient's Compensation Fund to be paid as reimbursement to the patient for
future medical expenses and related benefits as incurred, or by direct payment
to the provider, at the option of the patient.
(b) The court shall make such determination at a post-trial hearing at
which time all affected parties shall have the opportunity to present evidence
and to be heard before the determination is made by the court. The court shall
then render a final judgment with written reasons.
(c) In support of the judgment, the court shall consider the competence
of the patient and his family in managing the medical care and related benefits
of the patient, including the creation of a special needs trust fund, annuities for
future maintenance and support and other means of structuring the award that
assures the patient or his family can manage the patient's future needs without
the necessity of the Patient's Compensation Fund.
* * *
B. * * *
(3) "Future medical care and benefits" as used in this Section shall
include the payment of custodial care at fair and reasonable market value of
such services in the parish in which the patient customarily resides.
(4) The necessity of future medical care to be paid or reimbursed to the
patient under this Section, including the nature of any therapy to be afforded
to the patient, shall be deemed reasonable if it is prescribed by a duly licensed
physician in the state of Louisiana or of any other state where the patient
customarily resides.
* * *
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-570 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 366
§1231.8. Medical review panel
A.(1)(a) All malpractice claims against health care providers covered by this
Part, other than claims validly agreed for submission to a lawfully binding arbitration
procedure, shall may be reviewed by a medical review panel established as
hereinafter provided for in this Section. The filing of a request for review by a
medical review panel as provided for in this Section shall not be reportable by any
health care healthcare provider, the Louisiana Patient's Compensation Fund, or any
other entity to the Louisiana State Board of Medical Examiners, to any licensing
authority, committee, or board of any other state, or to any credentialing or similar
agency, committee, or board of any clinic, hospital, health insurer, or managed care
company.
* * *
B.(1)(a)(i) No action against a health care healthcare provider covered by
this Part, or his insurer, may be commenced in any court before the claimant's
proposed complaint has been presented to a medical review panel established
pursuant to this Section or, alternatively, an affidavit by a board certified medical
doctor, holding a valid and unrestricted license to practice in his specialty in the
state in which he resides or practices, certifies that adequate medical records of
the patient have been provided and reviewed by him, the records are sufficient
for him to state that the allegations of malpractice against each defendant
healthcare provider named in the petition constitute a breach of the standard
of care, and that the breach caused or contributed to injury or death of the
patient. The affidavit shall be notarized by a suitable authority for the state in
which the medical doctor resides or practices and filed contemporaneously with
the petition in the record of the district court in which the action is filed. If
subsequent to the filing of the petition, additional healthcare providers are
named as defendants, one of the alternative procedures required by this
Subsection shall be followed for the new parties. The prescriptive period for
actions initiated by affidavit shall be as provided by Civil Code Article 3493.1,
Page 5 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-570 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 366
provided that any action against a healthcare provider subject to this Part, even
as to claims filed within two years from the date of discovery, shall in all events
be filed at the latest within a period of three years from the date of the alleged
act, omission, or neglect.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 40:1231.3(G) and (H) are hereby repealed in their entirety.